Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5k. new text end new text begin Beltrami County State-Aid Highway 20. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, the speed limit on Beltrami County State-Aid Highway 20 is 30 miles per hour from the intersection with Beltrami County State-Aid Highway 21 to the entrance to Lake Bemidji State Park. The county engineer must erect appropriate signs displaying the speed limit. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. The new speed limit is effective when the required signs are erected. new text end